en: Award material: Acrylic; Brass; Bronze; Cardstock; Ceramic; Crystal; Glass; Gold-plated; Marble/Stone; Metal (unspecified); Nickel-plated; Paper; Plastic; Resin; Silver-plated; Stainless steel; Sterling silver; Wood; Zinc alloy; Other
de: Machart der Auszeichnung: Acryl; Messing; Bronze; Karton; Keramik; Kristall; Glas; Vergoldet; Marmor/Stein; Metall (unspezifiziert); Vernickelt; Papier; Kunststoff; Harz; Versilbert; Edelstahl; Sterlingsilber; Holz; Zinklegierung; Sonstige
pt-PT: Material para prémios: Acrílico; Latão; Bronze; Cartolina; Cerâmica; Cristal; Vidro; Banhado a ouro; Mármore/Pedra; Metal (não especificado); Niquelado; Papel; Plástico; Resina; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Prata de lei; Madeira; Liga de zinco; Outros
sk-SK: Materiál ocenenia: Akryl; Mosadz; Bronz; Kartón; Keramika; Krištáľ; Sklo; Pozlátené; Mramor/Kameň; Kov (nešpecifikované); Poniklované; Papier; Plast; Živica; Postriebrené; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Mincové striebro; Drevo; Zliatina zinku; Iné
pl: Materiał nagrody: Akryl; Mosiądz; Brąz; Karton; Ceramika; Kryształ; Szkło; Pozłacane; Marmur / kamień; Metal (nieokreślony); Poniklowane; Papier; Plastik; Żywica; Posrebrzane; Stal nierdzewna; Srebro wysokiej próby; Drewno; Stop cynku; Inne
th: วัสดุของรางวัล: อะคริลิก; ทองเหลือง; สำริด; กระดาษการ์ด; เซรามิก; คริสตัล; แก้ว; ชุบทอง; หินอ่อน/หิน; โลหะ (ไม่ระบุ); ชุบนิกเกิล; กระดาษ; พลาสติก; เรซิน; ชุบเงิน; สเตนเลสสตีล; เงินแท้; ไม้; ซิงก์อัลลอย; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал награды: Акрил; Латунь; Бронза; Картон; Керамика; Хрусталь; Стекло; С позолотой; Мрамор / камень; Металл (не указан); Никелированная; Бумага; Пластик; Смола; Посеребренная; Нержавеющая сталь; Стерлинговое серебро; Дерево; Цинковый сплав; Другое
hr-HR: Materijal nagrade: Akril; Mjed; Bronca; Karton; Keramika; Kristal; Staklo; Pozlaćeno; Mramor/kamen; Metal (nenaznačeno); Poniklano; Papir; Plastika; Smola; Posrebreno; Nehrđajući čelik; Srebro (sterling); Drvo; Legura cinka; Ostalo
ja: 賞品資料: アクリル; 真鍮; ブロンズ; カードストック; セラミック; クリスタル; ガラス; 金メッキ; 大理石・石; 金属 (未指定); ニッケルメッキ; 紙; プラスチック; 樹脂; 銀メッキ; ステンレス鋼; スターリングシルバー; 木製; 亜鉛合金; その他
el: Υλικό βραβείων: Ακρυλικό; Ορείχαλκος; Μπρούντζος; Χαρτόνι; Κεραμικό; Κρύσταλλο; Γυαλί; Επίχρυσο; Μάρμαρο/Πέτρα; Μέταλλο (μη καθορισμένο); Επινικελωμένο; Χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Ρητίνη; Επάργυρο; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ασήμι 925; Ξύλο; Κράμα ψευδαργύρου; Άλλο
pt-BR: Material do prêmio: Acrílico; Latão; Bronze; Papel-cartão; Cerâmica; Cristal; Vidro; Banhado a ouro; Mármore/Pedra; Metal (não especificado); Niquelado; Papel; Plástico; Resina; Banhado a prata; Aço inoxidável; Prata de lei; Madeira; Liga de zinco; Outro
ko: 상장/상패 재질: 아크릴; 황동; 청동; 카드스톡; 세라믹; 크리스탈; 유리; 금도금; 대리석/석재; 금속(미지정); 니켈 도금; 종이; 플라스틱; 레진; 은도금; 스테인리스 스틸; 스털링 실버; 목재; 아연 합금; 기타
zh-CN: 奖项材质: 亚克力; 黄铜; 青铜; 卡纸; 陶瓷; 水晶; 玻璃; 镀金; 大理石/石材; 金属（未说明）; 镀镍; 纸质; 塑料; 树脂; 镀银; 不锈钢; 925 纯银; 木质; 锌合金; 其他
sl-SI: Material priznanja: Akril; Medenina; Bron; Karton; Keramika; Kristal; Steklo; Pozlačeno; Marmor/kamen; Kovina (nedoločeno); Ponikljano; Papir; Plastika; Smola; Posrebreno; Nerjavno jeklo; Srebro sterling; Les; Cinkova zlitina; Drugo
zh-TW: 獎項材質: 壓克力; 黃銅; 青銅; 卡紙; 陶瓷; 水晶; 玻璃; 鍍金; 大理石/石頭; 金屬 (未指定); 鍍鎳; 紙張; 塑膠; 樹脂; 鍍銀; 不鏽鋼; 純銀; 木材; 鋅合金; 其他
fi: Palkinnon materiaali: Akryyli; Messinki; Pronssi; Kartonki; Keramiikka; Kristalli; Lasi; Kullattu; Marmori/Kivi; Metalli (määrittelemätön); Niklattu; Paperi; Muovi; Hartsi; Hopeoitu; Ruostumaton teräs; Sterling-hopea; Puu; Sinkkiseos; Muu
vi: Nội dung giải thưởng: Acrylic; Đồng thau; Đồng; Giấy bìa; Gốm; Pha lê; Thủy tinh; Mạ vàng; Cẩm thạch/Đá; Kim loại (không xác định); Mạ niken; Giấy; Nhựa; Nhựa tổng hợp; Mạ bạc; Thép không gỉ; Bạc Sterling; Gỗ; Hợp kim kẽm; Khác
sv: Prismaterial: Akryl; Mässing; Brons; Kartong; Keramik; Kristall; Glas; Guldpläterad; Marmor/sten; Metall (ospecificerad); Förnicklad; Papper; Plast; Konstharts; Silverpläterad; Rostfritt stål; Sterlingsilver; Trä; Zinklegering; Annat
tr: Ödül malzemesi: Akrilik; Pirinç; Bronz; Karton; Seramik; Kristal; Cam; Altın kaplama; Mermer/Taş; Metal (belirtilmemiş); Nikel kaplama; Kağıt; Plastik; Reçine; Gümüş kaplama; Paslanmaz çelik; Som gümüş; Ahşap; Çinko alaşımı; Diğer
da: Præmiemateriale: Akryl; Messing; Bronze; Karton; Keramik; Krystal; Glas; Forgyldt; Marmor/sten; Metal (uspecificeret); Forniklet; Papir; Plastik; Resin; Forsølvet; Rustfrit stål; Sterlingsølv; Træ; Zinklegering; Andet
fr: Matériau du trophée: Acrylique; Laiton; Bronze; Papier cartonné; Céramique; Cristal; Verre; Plaqué or; Marbre/pierre; Métal (non spécifié); Plaqué nickel; Papier; Plastique; Résine; Plaqué argent; Acier inoxydable; Argent massif; Bois; Alliage de zinc; Autre
es: Material del premio: Acrílico; Latón; Bronce; Cartulina; Cerámica; Cristal; Vidrio; Chapado en oro; Mármol/piedra; Metal (sin especificar); Niquelado; Papel; Plástico; Resina; Chapado en plata; Acero inoxidable; Plata esterlina; Madera; Aleación de zinc; Otro
hu: Díj anyaga: Akril; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Kartonpapír; Kerámia; Kristály; Üveg; Aranyozott; Márvány/kő; Fém (nem meghatározott); Nikkelezett; Papír; Műanyag; Gyanta; Ezüstözött; Rozsdamentes acél; Sterling ezüst; Fa; Cinkötvözet; Egyéb
ro-RO: Material certificat: Acril; Alamă; Bronz; Carton; Ceramică; Cristal; Sticlă; Placat cu aur; Marmură/Piatră; Metal (nespecificat); Placat cu nichel; Hârtie; Plastic; Rășină; Placat cu argint; Oțel inoxidabil; Argint veritabil; Lemn; Aliaj de zinc; Altele
it: Materiale del premio: Acrilico; Ottone; Bronzo; Cartoncino; Ceramica; Cristallo; Vetro; Placcato oro; Marmo/Pietra; Metallo (non specificato); Nichelato; Carta; Plastica; Resina; Placcato argento; Acciaio inossidabile; Argento sterling; Legno; Lega di zinco; Altro
cs: Materiál pro ocenění: Akryl; Mosaz; Bronz; Karton; Keramika; Křišťál; Sklo; Pozlacené; Mramor/kámen; Kov (nespecifikováno); Poniklované; Papír; Plast; Pryskyřice; Postříbřené; Nerezová ocel; Mincovní stříbro; Dřevo; Slitina zinku; Ostatní
nl: Awardmateriaal: Acryl; Messing; Brons; Karton; Keramiek; Kristal; Glas; Verguld; Marmer/steen; Metaal (ongespecificeerd); Vernikkeld; Papier; Plastic; Hars; Verzilverd; Roestvrij staal; Sterling zilver; Hout; Zinklegering; Overige
nb: Prismateriale: Akryl; Messing; Bronse; Kartong; Keramikk; Krystall; Glass; Gullbelagt; Marmor/stein; Metall (uspesifisert); Forniklet; Papir; Plast; Harpiks; Sølvbelagt; Rustfritt stål; Sterlingsølv; Tre; Sinklegering; Annet
bg-BG: Материал на наградата: Акрил; Месинг; Бронз; Картон; Керамика; Кристал; Стъкло; С позлата; Мрамор/Камък; Метал (неуточнен); С никелово покритие; Хартия; Пластмаса; Смола; Със сребърно покритие; Неръждаема стомана; Стерлингово сребро; Дърво; Цинкова сплав; Друго
lt-LT: Apdovanojimo medžiaga: Akrilas; Žalvaris; Bronza; Kortelių kartonas; Keramika; Krištolas; Stiklas; Paauksuotas; Marmuras / akmuo; Metalas (nenurodyta); Nikeliuotas; Popierius; Plastikas; Derva; Padengtas sidabru; Nerūdijantis plienas; Standartinis sidabras; Mediena; Cinko lydinys; Kita